src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ;  (4) Ind.Prt.Pl3: sarnnu
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

* :%^V2VV%^XYY2XY VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ;  (5-7) +Imprt+Sg2: säärn
* +Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ;  (5-7) ERR
Imprt+ConNeg, Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2
+Ger, +VAbess, +Pot, +Cond, +Imprt+Sg3

* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ;  (8) Imprt.13.ConNeg: sarnnu
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

* : VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ;  (9) särnnaz
+Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: särn»

V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Ind+Prt+ConNeg
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc, NomAct in MOsh

+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3

+Ind+Prs+Pl3

+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Imprt+ConNeg, Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2
+Ger, +VAbess, +Pot, +Cond, +Imprt+Sg3

Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

+Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: peit»

* LEXICON V_POAHSSAD  påhssad:på%^1VOWhss
* LEXICON V0_POAHSSAD  påhssad:på%^1VOWhss

* : VSUF-INF_AD ;  (1)  Inf: påhssad
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Ind+Prt+ConNeg
Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc, NomAct in MOsh

* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD ;  (2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: påhss
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3

* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>a K ;  (3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: påhssa
+Ind+Prs+Pl3

* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD ;  (4) Ind.Prt.Pl3: pohssu
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

* :%^V2VV%^XYY2VY VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ;  (5-7) +Imprt+Sg2: pååus
* +Err/Orth-should-be-grade-minus1: VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD ;  (5-7) ERR
Imprt+ConNeg, Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2
+Ger, +VAbess, +Pot, +Cond, +Imprt+Sg3

* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD ;  (8) Imprt.13.ConNeg: pohssu
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

* : VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD ;  (9) påhssaz
+Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: påus»

* LEXICON V_KUAEIVVAD  kuäivvad:kuäivv
* LEXICON IV_KUAEIVVAD  kuäivvad:kuäivv
* LEXICON TV_KUAEIVVAD  kuäivvad:kuäivv
* LEXICON V0_KUAEIVVAD  kuäivvad:kuäivv

* LEXICON V_KUAESTTAD  kuästtad:kuästt
* LEXICON IV_KUAESTTAD  kuästtad:kuästt
* LEXICON TV_KUAESTTAD  kuästtad:kuästt
* LEXICON V0_KUAESTTAD  kuästtad:kuästt

(2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: kuästt
(3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: kuästta
(4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: kuõsttu
(5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: kuäst-
(5) ERR
(7)  Imprt.Sg3: kuästas
(8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: kuõsttu

* LEXICON V_KUYISSAD  kuâissad:kuâivv
* LEXICON V0_KUYISSAD  kuâivvad:kuâivv

* LEXICON V_VEYHSSAD  veâhssad:veâhss
* LEXICON V0_VEYHSSAD  veâhssad:veâhss

(2)  Ind.Prs.Sg3: veâhss
(3)  Ind.Prs.Pl3: veâhssa
(4)  Ind.Prt.Pl3: viõhssu
(5)  Ind.Imprt.Sg2: veâus-
(5) ERR
(7)  Ind.Imprt.Sg3: veâusas
(8)  Imprt.13.ConNeg: viõhssu

* LEXICON V_MEINNAD  meinnad:meinn
* LEXICON V0_MEINNAD  meinnad:meinn

* LEXICON V_REIDDAD  reiddad:rẹ%^1VOWidd
* LEXICON V0_REIDDAD  reiddad:rẹ%^1VOWidd

### CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION
* LEXICON TV_MUQTTED  muʹtted:mutt
* LEXICON V0_MUQTTED  muʹtted:mutt

Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;  (1) +V+Inf: muʹtted
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;  (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mott
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ;  (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: moʹtte
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: muʹtte
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
* :%^V2VV%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) muuʹtt-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;   (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: muuʹtt
Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^V2VV%^VOWLower VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: moottas
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: muttu
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: mottaz
Imprt+Pl3

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) +V+PrsPrc: muʹtti

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^V2VV VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: muutt

* LEXICON V_PUUQTTED  puuʹtted:puutt
* LEXICON V0_PUUQTTED  puuʹtted:puutt

Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;  (1) +V+Inf: puuʹtted
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;  (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: poott
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VV2V%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ;  (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: poʹtte
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VV2V%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puʹtte
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
* :%^VOWLower%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) pooʹđ-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;   (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: puuʹđ
Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWLower%^CC2C VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: poođas
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VV2V VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: puttu
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VV2V%^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: pottaz
Imprt+Pl3

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) +V+PrsPrc: puuʹtti

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: puuđ-

* LEXICON V_LAQDDED  laʹdded:ladd
* LEXICON V0_LAQDDED  laʹdded:ladd
Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;  (1) +V+Inf: laʹdded
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;  (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lädd
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%^PAL%>e K ;  (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: läʹdde
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: laʹdde
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
* :%^V2VV%^PAL VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) laaʹdd-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^V2VV%^PAL%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;   (6) +V+Imprt+Sg2: laaʹdd
Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^V2VV%^VOWLower VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: lääddas
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: laddu
Imprt+ConNegII, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWLower VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: läddaz
Imprt+Pl3

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^PAL FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) +V+PrsPrc: laʹddi

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^V2VV VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: laadd-

* LEXICON V_VUEQTTED  vueʹtted:vuâtt
* LEXICON TV_VUEQTTED  vueʹtted:vuâtt
* LEXICON V0_VUEQTTED  vueʹtted:vuâtt
like: V_JUEQKHKHED

Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		 (1) lieʹđđed 
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		 (2) leâđđ
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALÄ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;      (3) leäʹđˈđe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) liõʹđˈđe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization
* :%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) lieʹđ-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6 lieʹđež
* +Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%^VOWRaise%^PAL%^CC2C%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6 liõʹđež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^CC2C%> VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) leâđ-
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8 liõđđu
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization (9)
* :%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;   leâđˈđaz
Imprt+Pl3

Allegro (10) lieʹđ»

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) liõʹđđi

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^CC2C VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: liõđ-

* LEXICON V_JUEQKHKHED  jueʹǩǩed:juâ%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON IV_JUEQKHKHED  jueʹǩǩed:juâ%{ʹØ%}kk
* LEXICON V0_JUEQKHKHED  jueʹǩǩed:juâ%{ʹØ%}kk
* Yaml: **V-juekked**
Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;  (1) +V+Inf: jueʹǩǩed
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ;  (2) +V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: juâkk
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALẸ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%>e K ;  (3) +V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: juẹʹǩˈǩe
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CC2CCC%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) +V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: juõʹǩˈǩe
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization 
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^KK2GG VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) jueʹjj-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^KK2GG%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;   (6) +V+Pot+Sg3: !! juõʹjjež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot, 

Weak-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^KK2GG VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED ;  (7) +V+Imprt+Sg3: juâǥǥas
Ind+Prs+Sg1, Ind+Prs+Sg2, Cond,  Imprt+Sg3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED ;  (8) +V+Imprt+ConNegII: juõkˈku
Imprt+ConNeg, Pass+PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* :%^CC2CCC VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED ;  (9) Ind.Imprt.Pl3: juâkˈkaz
Imprt+Pl3

(10) Allegro for incoative: jueʹj»
Secondary allegro for incoative: juâǥ»

(11) Present Participle:
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%> FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;  (11) +V+PrsPrc: juõʹǩǩi

(12) Weak-RaisedVowel-NoPalatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^KK2GG VSUF-CHED_ED ;   (12) +Der+Der/ched: juõǥǥ

* LEXICON V_KUEQDDDED  kueʹdded:kuâdˈd
* LEXICON TV_KUEQDDDED  kueʹdded:kuâdˈd
* LEXICON V0_KUEQDDDED  kueʹdded:kuâdˈd
like: V_JUEQKHKHED

Strong-HighVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL VSUF-INF_ED ;		 (1) kueʹdˈded 
V+Inf, Ind+Prs+Pl1, Ind+Prs+Pl2, Imprt+Pl1, Imprt+Pl2
Actio, ActEss, PrsPrc

Strong-LoweredVowel-No-palatalization
* : VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED ; 	     		 (2) kuâdˈd
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Ind.Prt.ConNeg, PrfPrc

ExtraStrong-LoweredVowel-Palatalization
* +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^PALE%^PAL%>e K ;      (3) kueʹdˈde
+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3

ExtraStrong-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PAL%> VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED ;  (4) kuõʹdˈde
+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3,  Ind+Prt+Sg1, Ind+Prt+Sg2, Ind+Prt+Sg4

Weak-StableV-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALE%^PAL%^CCC2CC VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED ;  (5) kueʹdd-
Imprt+Sg2, Ind+Prs+ConNeg, Ind+Prs+Sg4, VAbess, GerTemp, GerInstr
Ger.Temp.PxSg3: jeäʹleeʹstes

Weak-RaisedVowel-Palatalization
* :%^VOWRaise%^PALÕ%^PAL%^CCC2CC%> VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED ;  (6) kuõʹddež
Ind+Prt+Sg3, Ind+Prt+Pl1, Ind+Prt+Pl2, Pot,
